Mississippi statutes. Title 69. Agriculture, Horticulture, and Animals
Article 9. Acquisition of Heavy or Specialized Machinery or Equipment Necessary for Installation of Soil and Water Conservation Measures.

§ 69-27-331.
Conservation commission authorized to acquire and make available machinery and equipment; amortization of costs; rental fees.

The State Soil and Water Conservation Commission, subject to the restrictions provided in Sections 69-27-331 through 69-27-341, is authorized to acquire and to make available, or to assist in acquiring or making available to soil and water conservation districts, heavy or specialized machinery or equipment deemed necessary for installation and implementation of soil and water conservation practices or measures.

The heavy or specialized machinery or equipment purchased under this section may be either new or used. The commission may purchase used equipment through a duly licensed and authorized public auction of agricultural, heavy or specialized equipment as authorized under Section 31-7-13.

When the commission acquires or makes available to any district the machinery or equipment referred to in subsection (1) of this section, it shall require the district to fully amortize to the commission any amount so expended by the commission for such assistance. The amount and method of amortization for each piece of heavy or specialized machinery or equipment shall be determined by the commission in conjunction with the soil and water conservation district. In making this determination, the following shall be considered: (a) full amortization to the commission of the capital outlay for the machinery or equipment over the period of its reasonably anticipated full usefulness; and, when necessary (b) (i) cover the cost of operation, maintenance and repairs; (ii) pay the usual cost of providing an operator; (iii) compensate the district for the usual costs of transportation from one (1) job to another.

In giving effect to all of the foregoing, the commission shall estimate the amount of time such machinery or equipment would ordinarily be idle.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1990, ch. 499, § 1; Laws, 1991, ch. 341, § 1; Laws, 2001, ch. 333, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 5, 2001.).

§ 69-27-333.
Commission to retain title to machinery and equipment.

The Soil and Water Conservation Commission shall retain title to each piece of heavy or specialized machinery or equipment so purchased and made available to any soil and water conservation district until such time as the district fully amortizes the commission’s investment in such machinery or equipment. After the commission’s investment in such machinery or equipment has been fully amortized, it is authorized and empowered to transfer the title thereto to the district.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1990, ch. 499, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1990.

§ 69-27-335.
Record keeping requirements; inventory of equipment.

Each soil and water conservation district which receives or uses the machinery or equipment referred to in Section 69-27-331 shall maintain its public records to show for each piece of machinery or equipment: (a) the amounts collected from each job in each district; (b) the expense of repairing, moving, manning and other usual cost of operation; and (c) the amount paid by each district for the purpose of amortizing the commission’s investment in such machinery or equipment. Each of such districts shall send a duplicate copy of those records to the commission, which shall retain such copies in its files for public inspection. In addition thereto, the commission shall at all times maintain an account showing each piece of machinery or equipment the title to which is vested in it, the amount paid thereon by any soil and water conservation district, and the amount remaining to be amortized; and the commission shall also maintain a current inventory of all such equipment, shall have such equipment marked and identified as being the property of the commission, and shall promulgate rules and regulations which shall ensure that the use of such equipment within each district is on an equitable basis.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1990, ch. 499, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 1990.

§ 69-27-337.
Payment of amortized rental fees; collection of delinquent payments; deposit of funds.

The amount paid by any such district to the commission for amortization purposes shall be made semiannually. When payments are not received by the commission within sixty (60) days of the due date the commission shall take all necessary actions to collect such delinquent payments. Amounts received or collected hereunder shall be credited to the revolving fund created in Section 69-27-343.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1990, ch. 499, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 1990.

§ 69-27-339.
Conservation districts authorized to obtain machinery or equipment in combination.

Any two (2) or more soil and water conservation districts may combine with each other for the purpose of obtaining and using the machinery or equipment referred to in Section 69-27-331, on the terms and conditions set forth in Sections 69-27-331 through 69-27-341.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1990, ch. 499, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 1990.

§ 69-27-341.
Commission authorized to promulgate rules and regulations.

The commission is authorized to promulgate such rules and regulations or methods of accounting as may be necessary or expedient to give effect to the purposes expressed in Sections 69-27-331 through 69-27-341.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1990, ch. 499, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 1990.

§ 69-27-343.
Revolving fund.

There is created in the State Treasury a revolving fund which shall be comprised of any monies appropriated thereto by the Legislature, the proceeds from any bonds issued under Sections 69-27-345 through 69-27-365, and payments made by districts to the commission for amortization purposes. The costs of all machinery and equipment acquired by the commission for soil and water conservation districts under Sections 69-27-331 through 69-27-341 shall be paid from the revolving fund. The monies in the revolving fund shall not be used for any purpose other than to make available to soil and water conservation districts the machinery and equipment of the type referred to in Section 69-27-331 or to make principal and interest payments on the bond issue as required by Section 69-27-347. The monies in the revolving fund shall not lapse to the General Fund at the end of the fiscal year.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1990, ch. 499, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 1990.

§ 69-27-345.
Authority to issue bonds to fund revolving fund.

The State Soil and Water Conservation Commission is authorized, at one time or from time to time, to declare by resolution the necessity for issuance of negotiable general obligation bonds of the State of Mississippi to provide funds for the revolving fund established in Section 69-27-343. Upon the adoption of a resolution by the commission, declaring the necessity for the issuance of any part or all of the general obligation bonds authorized by Sections 69-27-345 through 69-27-365, the commission shall deliver a certified copy of its resolution or resolutions to the State Bond Commission. Upon receipt of same, the State Bond Commission, in its discretion, shall act as the issuing agent, prescribe the form of the bonds, advertise for and accept bids, issue and sell the bonds so authorized to be sold, and do any and all other things necessary and advisable in connection with the issuance and sale of such bonds. The amount of bonds issued under Sections 69-27-345 through 69-27-365 shall not exceed Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($500,000.00) in the aggregate.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1990, ch. 499, § 8; Laws, 2005, ch. 521, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 20, 2005.).

§ 69-27-347.
State’s full faith and credit pledged; repayment of bonds.

For the payment of such bonds and the interest thereon, the full faith, credit, and taxing power of the State of Mississippi are hereby irrevocably pledged. If the Legislature finds that there are sufficient funds available in the General Fund of the State Treasury to pay maturing principal and accruing interest of the bonds, and if the Legislature appropriates such available funds for the purpose of paying such maturing principal and accruing interest, then the maturing principal and accruing interest of the bonds shall be paid from appropriations made by the Legislature from the General Fund of the State Treasury.

All monies in such revolving fund which are not necessary to pay accruing bonds and interest shall be invested by the State Treasurer in such securities as are provided by law for the investment of funds of the state, and the earnings on such investments shall be transferred by the Treasurer into the revolving fund created in Section 69-27-343.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1990, ch. 499, § 9; Laws, 2005, ch. 521, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 20, 2005.).

§ 69-27-349.
Terms of bonds; sale of bonds; expenses of issuance.

Such bonds may be executed and delivered by the state at any time and from time to time, may be in such form and denominations and of such terms and maturities, may be in fully registered form or in bearer form registrable either as to principal or interest or both, may bear such conversion privileges and be payable in such installments and at such time or times not exceeding twenty (20) years from the date thereof, may be payable at such place or places, whether within or without the State of Mississippi, may bear interest payable at such time or times and at such place or places and evidenced in such manner, and may contain such provisions not inconsistent herewith, all as shall be provided in the proceedings of the State Bond Commission under which the bonds are authorized to be issued. Such bonds shall not bear a greater overall maximum interest rate to maturity than that authorized by law for general obligation bonds. If deemed advisable by the State Bond Commission, there may be retained in the proceedings under which any such bonds are authorized to be issued an option to redeem all or any part thereof as may be specified in such proceedings, at such price or prices and after such notice or notices and on such terms and conditions as may be set forth in such proceedings and briefly recited or referred to on the face of the bonds, but nothing herein contained shall be construed to confer on the state any right or option to redeem any bonds, except as may be provided in the proceedings under which they shall be issued. Any such bonds shall be sold on sealed bids at public sale, and for such price as the State Bond Commission determines to be in the best interest of the State of Mississippi, but no such sale shall be made at a price less than par value plus accrued interest to date of delivery of the bonds to the purchaser. The state may pay all expenses, premiums and commissions which the State Bond Commission may deem necessary or advantageous in connection with the issuance thereof, but solely from the proceeds of the bonds. The issuance by the state of one or more series of bonds shall not preclude it from issuing other series of bonds, but the proceedings under which any subsequent bonds may be issued shall recognize and protect any prior pledge made for any prior issuance of bonds.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1990, ch. 499, § 10, eff from and after July 1, 1990.

§ 69-27-351.
Interest on bonds; maturity of bonds.

No bond issued under Sections 69-27-345 through 69-27-365 shall bear more than one (1) rate of interest; each bond shall bear interest from its date to its stated maturity date at the interest rate specified on the bonds; and all bonds of the same maturity shall bear the same rate of interest from date to maturity. All interest accruing on bonds shall be payable semiannually or annually, except the first interest coupon attached to any bond may be for any period not exceeding one (1) year. If bonds are issued in coupon form, no interest payment shall be evidenced by more than one (1) coupon, and neither cancelled nor supplemental coupons shall be permitted. If serial bonds, such bonds shall mature annually, and the first maturity date thereof shall not be more than five (5) years from the date of such bonds.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1990, ch. 499, § 11, eff from and after July 1, 1990; Laws, 1993, ch. 472, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved March 27, 1993).

§ 69-27-353.
Notice of sale of bonds.

Notice of the sale of any such bonds shall be published at least two (2) times, the first of which shall be made not less than ten (10) days prior to the date of sale, and shall be so published in one or more newspapers having a general circulation in the City of Jackson and in one or more other newspapers or financial journals with a large national circulation, to be selected by the State Bond Commission.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1990, ch. 499, § 12, eff from and after July 1, 1990.

§ 69-27-355.
Execution of bonds; signatures on bonds.

All bonds shall be executed on behalf of the state by the manual or facsimile signature of the Chairman of the State Bond Commission and shall be countersigned by the manual or facsimile signature of the Secretary of the State Bond Commission. All coupons shall be executed on behalf of the state by the facsimile signatures of the Chairman and Secretary of the State Bond Commission. If the officers whose signatures or countersignatures appear on the bonds or interest coupons shall cease to be such officers before delivery of the bonds, such signatures or countersignatures shall nevertheless be valid and sufficient for all purposes, the same as if they had remained in office until such delivery, or had been in office on the date such bonds may bear.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1990, ch. 499, § 13, eff from and after July 1, 1990.

§ 69-27-357.
Deposit of proceeds of bonds; disbursements.

Upon the issuance and sale of such bonds, the State Bond Commission shall transfer the proceeds of any such sale or sales to the revolving fund created in Section 69-27-343. The proceeds of such bonds shall be disbursed solely upon the order of the Soil and Water Conservation Commission under such restrictions, if any, as may be contained in the resolution providing for the issuance of the bonds.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1990, ch. 499, § 14, eff from and after July 1, 1990.

§ 69-27-359.
Attorney General to represent Bond Commission in issuing bonds; payment of costs.

Except as otherwise authorized in Section 7-5-39, the Attorney General of the State of Mississippi shall represent the Soil and Water Conservation Commission in issuing, selling and validating bonds authorized under Sections 69-27-345 through 69-27-365, and the commission is authorized to pay from the proceeds derived from the sale of such bonds or from other funds available to the commission, the reasonable cost of approving attorney’s fees, validating, printing, cost of delivery of such bonds and any other necessary costs of issuance.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1990, ch. 499, § 15; Laws, 2012, ch. 546, § 31, eff from and after July 1, 2012.

§ 69-27-361.
Bonds as legal investments.

Bonds issued under Sections 69-27-345 through 69-27-365 shall be legal investments for commercial banks, trust companies, savings and loan associations and insurance companies organized under the laws of this state.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1990, ch. 499, § 16, eff from and after July 1, 1990.

§ 69-27-363.
Bonds and income exempt from certain taxes.

All bonds issued under Sections 69-27-345 through 69-27-365 and the income therefrom shall be exempt from all taxation except gift, transfer and inheritance taxes.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1990, ch. 499, § 17, eff from and after July 1, 1990.

§ 69-27-365.
Sections 69-27-345 through 69-27-363 as complete authority for issuance of bonds.

Sections 69-27-345 through 69-27-363, without reference to any statute not referred to herein, shall be deemed to be full and complete authority for the issuance of such bonds, and shall be construed as an additional and alternative method therefor, and none of the present restrictions, requirements, conditions or limitations of law applicable to the issuance or sale of bonds, notes or other obligations by the state shall apply to the issuance and sale of bonds under Sections 69-27-345 through 69-27-363, and no proceedings shall be required for the issuance of such bonds other than those provided for and required herein, and all powers necessary to be exercised in order to carry out the provisions of Sections 69-27-345 through 69-27-363 are hereby conferred.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1990, ch. 499, § 18, eff from and after July 1, 1990.

§ 69-27-367.
Severability provision.

If for any reason any section, paragraph, provision, clause or part of Sections 69-27-345 through 69-27-365 shall be held unconstitutional or invalid, that section shall not affect or invalidate any other section, paragraph, provision, clause or part of sections 69-27-331 through 69-27-367 not in and of itself invalid, but the remaining portions thereof shall be in force without regard to that so invalidated.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1990, ch. 499, § 19, eff from and after July 1, 1990.

§ 69-27-369.
Sale of equipment by Commission; retention and use of funds solely for purchase of equipment.

The Soil and Water Conservation Commission is hereby authorized to retain all funds generated from the sale of equipment. Any funds made available from the sale of equipment shall be deposited into the special fund in the State Treasury to the credit of the Soil and Water Conservation Commission and shall be used solely for the purpose of purchasing equipment.

Sales of equipment may be made by the Soil and Water Conservation Commission by any lawful method, including public auction. The Department of Audit shall adopt rules and regulations governing any sale conducted by public auction.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1993, ch. 384, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1993.